Louisiana, session 2026, HB313.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the state treasurer
is hereby authorized and directed to transfer $144,268,468 to be comprised wholly of
nonrecurring revenues out of the State General Fund from the Fiscal Year 2024-2025
surplus, as recognized by the Revenue Estimating Conference, to the Budget Stabilization
Fund.
Section 2.(A) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the state
treasurer is hereby authorized and directed to transfer $12,760,000 from the State General
Fund (Direct) into the Voting Technology Fund.
(B) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the state treasurer is
hereby authorized and directed to transfer $5,000,000 from the State General Fund (Direct)
into the Oil and Gas Regulatory Dedicated Fund Account.
(C) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the state treasurer is
hereby authorized and directed to transfer $1,000,000 from the State General Fund (Direct)
into the Carbon Dioxide Geologic Storage Trust Fund.
(D) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the state treasurer is
hereby authorized and directed to transfer $892,093 from the State General Fund (Direct)
into the Criminal Justice Priority Fund.
(E) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the state treasurer is
hereby authorized and directed to transfer $2,400,000 from the State General Fund (Direct)
into the Federal Energy Settlement Fund.
(F) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the state treasurer is
hereby authorized and directed to deposit into the Overcollections Fund from the revenues
in the state general fund an amount equal to the amount of the State General Fund (Direct)
for each line item appropriation in the Act that originated as House Bill No. 312 of the 2026
Regular Session of the Legislature that has a State General Fund (Direct) appropriation that
is vetoed by the governor other than pursuant to his authority under Article IV, Section
5(G)(2) of the Constitution of Louisiana and that is not overridden by the legislature.
Page 2 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 313 ENROLLED
Section 3.(A) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the state
treasurer is hereby authorized and directed to transfer $900,000 from the State General Fund
(Direct) into the Imagination Library of Louisiana Fund.
(B) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the state treasurer is
hereby authorized and directed to transfer $1,000,000 from the State General Fund (Direct)
into the Reading Enrichment and Academic Deliverables Fund.
(C) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the state treasurer is
hereby authorized and directed to transfer $500,000 from the State General Fund (Direct)
into the Conservation Incentive Program Account.
(D) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the state treasurer is
hereby authorized and directed to deposit into the Overcollections Fund from the revenues
in the state general fund an amount equal to the amount of the State General Fund (Direct)
for each line item appropriation in the Act that originated as House Bill No. 1 of the 2026
Regular Session of the Legislature that has a State General Fund (Direct) appropriation that
is vetoed by the governor other than pursuant to his authority under Article IV, Section
5(G)(2) of the Constitution of Louisiana and that is not overridden by the legislature.
(E) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the state treasurer is
hereby authorized and directed to deposit into the Overcollections Fund from the revenues
in the state general fund an amount equal to the amount of the State General Fund (Direct)
for each appropriation in the Act that originated as House Bill No. 1 of the 2026 Regular
Session of the Legislature that has an appropriation that is reduced by the governor pursuant
to his authority under Article VIII, Section 13(B) of the Constitution of Louisiana and that
is consented to in writing by two-thirds of the elected members of each house of the
legislature. No funding applicable to the instructional activities of city, parish, or other local
public school systems or schools pursuant to the Minimum Foundation Program formula
shall be transferred pursuant to this Subsection.
Section 4. R.S. 17:407.30(B) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§407.30. Louisiana Early Childhood Education Fund
* * *
Page 3 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 313 ENROLLED
B. After satisfying the requirements of the Bond Security and Redemption
Fund as provided in Article VII, Section 9(B) of the Constitution of Louisiana,
except as otherwise provided by law, monies shall be deposited into the fund as
follows:
(1) The avails of the monies provided for in R.S. 39:82(J).
(2) Any appropriations, public or private grants, gifts, or donations received
by the state or the Department of Education for the purposes of this Section, other
than federal funds for the Child Care and Development Fund Program, shall also be
credited to the fund.
* * *
Section 5. R.S. 39:100.118(B) and 100.256(D) and (E) are hereby amended and
reenacted and R.S. 39:82(L), 100.112(F)(2)(e), 100.171(D), 100.252(F), 100.253(D)(4),
100.255(D)(6), 100.257, and 100.258 are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§82. Remission of cash balances to the state treasurer; authorized withdrawals of
state monies after the close of the fiscal year; reports
* * *
L. Notwithstanding the provisions of this Section, for Fiscal Year 2025-
2026, the treasurer shall deposit all cash balances of any state funds occurring from
any appropriations made by legislative act or the Interim Emergency Board to the
Department of Education at the end of the fiscal year into the Louisiana Early
Childhood Education Fund. Provided, however, the provisions of this Subsection
shall not apply to any dedicated funds that would otherwise be retained by the
respective funds or state funds for which a bona fide liability exists on the last day
of Fiscal Year 2025-2026.
* * *
§100.112. Revenue Stabilization Trust Fund
* * *
F.(1)
* * *
Page 4 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 313 ENROLLED
(2)(a)
* * *
(e) Notwithstanding any provision of this Paragraph to the contrary, for
Fiscal Year 2026-2027, the minimum fund balance shall equal one billion five
hundred thirty-two million one hundred thirty-two thousand two hundred eighty-five
dollars and the allowable percentage shall equal thirty-six percent.
* * *
§100.118. Local Revenue Fund
* * *
B. The monies in the fund shall be used solely for distribution to ad valorem
tax recipient bodies within a parish to offset losses attributable to business inventory
exemptions to the ad valorem tax granted by a parish. the following:
(1) Distribution to ad valorem tax recipient bodies within a parish to offset
losses attributable to business inventory exemptions to the ad valorem tax granted
by a parish.
(2) Beginning July 1, 2026, the treasurer shall annually deposit five million
dollars of these monies into the Local Infrastructure Fund for reimbursement of
qualifying expenses of a political subdivision incurred in the repair or mitigation of
damage caused by the expansion of broadband services.
* * *
§100.171. Hurricane Ida Recovery Fund
* * *
D. All monies received by a recipient entity pursuant to the provisions of this
Section shall be expended no later than June 30, 2027. All such monies not
expended by this date shall be returned to the state treasury by the recipient entity no
later than August 1, 2027. As used in this Section, the term "expended" does not
include obligation of funds without payment in full having been made.
* * *
§100.252. Louisiana Transportation Infrastructure Fund
* * *
Page 5 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 313 ENROLLED
F. For Fiscal Year 2026-2027, the monies deposited in the fund shall be
utilized for the following:
(1) The amount of one hundred twenty-five million shall be used for
transportation infrastructure initiatives.
(2) Of the remaining monies deposited into the fund in Fiscal Year 2026-
2027, the amount of one hundred million dollars shall be used for the Highway
Priority Program.
(3) Of the remaining monies deposited into the fund in Fiscal Year 2026-
2027, the amount of sixty-three million dollars shall be used for district maintenance
funding.
(4) Of the remaining monies deposited into the fund in Fiscal Year 2026-
2027, the amount of thirty-five million dollars shall be used for a box culvert
program administered by the Department of Transportation and Development.
(5) Of the remaining monies deposited into the fund in Fiscal Year 2026-
2027, the amount of thirty million dollars will be used for state highway initiatives
administered by the division of administration.
(6) Of the remaining monies deposited into the fund in Fiscal Year 2026-
2027, the amount of twenty-five million dollars shall be used for a box culvert
program administered by the division of administration.
§100.253. Higher Education Campus Revitalization Fund
* * *
D. The monies in the fund shall be utilized for the following:
* * *
(4) For Fiscal Year 2026-2027 monies in the fund shall be used for the
following:
(a) Of the remaining monies deposited into the fund in Fiscal Year 2026-
2027, the amount of three million eight hundred thousand dollars shall be used for
land acquisitions and facilities at Louisiana State University at Alexandria.
Page 6 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 313 ENROLLED
(b) Of the remaining monies deposited into the fund in Fiscal Year 2026-
2027, the amount of three million three hundred thousand dollars shall be used for
costs associated with training initiatives at River Parishes Community College.
* * *
§100.255. Louisiana Economic Development Initiatives Fund
* * *
D. The monies in the fund shall be utilized for the following:
* * *
(6) For Fiscal Year 2026-2027 monies in the fund shall be used for the
following:
(a) The state treasurer shall deposit the first fifty million dollars of monies
received into the Site Investment and Infrastructure Improvement Fund.
(b) Of the remaining monies deposited into the fund in Fiscal Year 2026-
2027, the amount of twenty-five million dollars shall be used for strategic
investments in the healthcare industry at Louisiana State University Health Sciences
Center at Shreveport.
(c) Of the remaining monies deposited into the fund in Fiscal Year 2026-
2027, the amount of ten million dollars shall be used for economic development
investments associated with the redevelopment of the Charity Hospital and Medical
Center of Louisiana at New Orleans.
(d) Of the remaining monies deposited into the fund in Fiscal Year 2026-
2027, the state treasurer shall deposit the amount of five million dollars into the
Rapid Response Fund.
(e) Of the remaining monies deposited into the fund in Fiscal Year 2026-
2027, the amount of five million dollars shall be used for economic development
initiatives aimed at the wood pellet industry.
(f) Of the remaining monies deposited into the fund in Fiscal Year 2026-
2027, the amount of two million dollars shall be used for innovation initiatives
throughout the state.
Page 7 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 313 ENROLLED
§100.256. Local Infrastructure Fund
* * *
D. Monies in the fund shall be appropriated to the division of administration,
office of community development office of public health, Louisiana Department of
Health, for the reimbursement of qualifying expenses of a political subdivision
incurred in the repair or mitigation of damage caused by the expansion of broadband
services.
E. The division of administration, office of community development office
of public health, Louisiana Department of Health, shall develop guidelines for the
administration of monies in the fund and shall submit such guidelines for review and
approval by the Water Sector Commission Joint Legislative Committee on the
Budget prior to implementation. The office of community development shall submit
a quarterly report to the Water Sector Commission on the monies expended from the
fund.
§100.257. Criminal Justice Technology Innovation Fund
There is hereby established in the state treasury, as a special fund, the
Criminal Justice Technology Innovation Fund, hereinafter referred to in this Section
as the "fund". Any money transferred or appropriated to the fund by the legislature
shall be deposited into the fund after compliance with the requirements of Article
VII, Section 9(B) of the Constitution of Louisiana relative to the Bond Security and
Redemption Fund. All unexpended and unencumbered monies in the fund at the end
of the fiscal year shall remain in the fund. The monies in the fund shall be invested
by the state treasurer in the same manner as monies in the state general fund, and
interest earned on the investment of monies in the fund shall be credited to the fund.
Notwithstanding the provisions of Chapter 10 of Title 38 and Part V-A of Chapter
1 and Chapter 17 of Title 39 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950, monies in
the fund shall be used by offices of the district attorney to leverage technology to
collaborate with other entities and facilitate interagency communication regarding
care and protection of youth.
Page 8 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 313 ENROLLED
§100.258. Strategic Investments Across Louisiana Fund
There is hereby established in the state treasury, as a special fund, the
Strategic Investments Across Louisiana Fund, hereinafter referred to in this Section
as the "fund". Any money transferred or appropriated to the fund by the legislature
shall be deposited into the fund after compliance with the requirements of Article
VII, Section 9(B) of the Constitution of Louisiana relative to the Bond Security and
Redemption Fund. All unexpended and unencumbered monies in the fund at the end
of the fiscal year shall remain in the fund. The monies in the fund shall be invested
by the state treasurer in the same manner as monies in the state general fund, and
interest earned on the investment of monies in the fund shall be credited to the fund.
Monies in the fund shall be subject to appropriation.
* * *
Section 6. R.S. 39:1533(A) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1533. Self-Insurance Fund
A.(1) There is hereby created in the Department of the Treasury a special
fund to be known as the "Self-Insurance Fund". The fund shall consist of all
premiums paid by state agencies under the state's risk management program as
established by this Chapter, the investment income earned from such premiums, and
commissions retained in accordance with the provisions of this Title. This fund shall
be used only for the payment of losses incurred by state agencies under the
self-insurance program, premiums for insurance obtained through commercial
carriers, administrative expenses associated with the management of the state's risk,
law enforcement officers and firemen's survivors benefits as provided for in R.S.
40:1665(C) and 1665.2(C), law enforcement officers and firemen's disability benefits
as provided for in R.S. 40:1668, the payment of extraordinary medical and dental
expenses for firemen and law enforcement officers as provided for in R.S. 40:1668.1,
the payment of losses incurred by the Jefferson Parish Human Services Authority in
accordance with R.S. 28:831(J), the payment of losses incurred by the Capital Area
Human Services District in accordance with R.S. 28:906, the payment of losses
incurred by the Florida Parishes Human Services Authority in accordance with R.S.
Page 9 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 313 ENROLLED
28:856, the payment of losses incurred by the Metropolitan Human Services District
in accordance with R.S. 28:866, the payment of losses incurred by the Northeast
Delta Human Services Authority in accordance with R.S. 28:896, the payment of
losses incurred by the South Central Louisiana Human Services Authority in
accordance with R.S. 28:876, and the funding of the legal services, such funds to be
administered by the commissioner of administration.
(2) Payments for law enforcement officers and firemen survivor and
disability benefits and extraordinary medical and dental expenses as provided for in
R.S. 40:1665(C), 1665.2(C), and 1668, and 1668.1 shall be made by the office of risk
management on behalf of the Law Enforcement Officers and Firemen's Survivor
Benefit Review Board as a result of a specific appropriation received for that
purpose. Aggregate payments made pursuant to this Paragraph shall not exceed five
million dollars in any given fiscal year.
* * *
Section 7. R.S. 48:197(B)(3) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§197. Motor vehicle license tax; Regional Maintenance and Improvement Fund
* * *
B.(1)
* * *
(3) Monies in the fund shall be appropriated to Jefferson Parish and used
exclusively for maintenance and improvements along the Westbank Expressway US
90 Business corridor and Louisiana Highway 45 (LA 45), and the construction of
walkways and pedestrian bridges along Louisiana Highway 541 (River Road), all
located in Jefferson Parish, including the operation and maintenance of all lighting
previously operated and maintained by the Department of Transportation and
Development.
Section 8. R.S. 49:259(B)(1) and (C)(3) are hereby amended and reenacted to read
as follows:
§259. Department of Justice Legal Support Fund
* * *
Page 10 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 313 ENROLLED
B.(1) After satisfying the requirements of the Bond Security and Redemption
Fund as provided in Article VII, Section 9(B) of the Constitution of Louisiana, the
treasurer shall transfer into the fund each fiscal year from proceeds received as
provided in Subsection A of this Section an amount which together with the balance
in the fund as of each July first is sufficient to bring the balance in the fund to fifteen
twenty million dollars annually. Annual deposits into the fund shall not exceed a
total of fifteen twenty million dollars, and the balance of the fund shall not exceed
fifteen twenty million dollars. Any proceeds received as provided in Subsection A
of this Section, after making the total annual deposit into the fund of fifteen twenty
million dollars, shall be deposited into the state general fund.
* * *
C.(1)
* * *
(3) Each fiscal year, monies shall be deposited into the fund in an amount
sufficient to bring the unencumbered balance in the fund to fifteen twenty million
dollars.
* * *
Section 9. R.S. 51:2316(B)(2) is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 51:1260(I)
and 2316(D) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1260. Major Events Incentive Fund; Major Events Incentive Program
* * *
I. Notwithstanding the provisions of Subsection E of this Section, contracts
entered into for events which have received a specific appropriation in an Act by the
legislature shall not require prior approval of the Joint Legislative Committee on the
Budget.
* * *
§2316. Site Investment and Infrastructure Improvement Fund
* * *
B.(1)
* * *
Page 11 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 313 ENROLLED
(2) Monies in the fund shall be invested in the same manner as monies in the
state general fund. Interest earned on investment of monies in the fund shall be
deposited into the state general fund. Unexpended and unencumbered monies in the
fund at the end of the fiscal year shall remain in the fund. The state treasurer is
hereby directed to invest the monies in the fund in a separate portfolio. All
investment income earned on monies in the fund, net of investment expenditures,
shall be credited to Louisiana Economic Development, and may be used as program
revenue for purposes consistent with this Section.
* * *
D. Notwithstanding any other provision of law or rule to the contrary, of the
amounts deposited into the Fund in Fiscal Year 2026-2027, the amount of five
million nine hundred thousand dollars will serve as the repayment on behalf of the
Vinton Harbor and Terminal District.
Section 10. R.S. 39:100.49 and 100.50 are hereby repealed in their entirety.
Section 11. In accordance with the provisions of Article VII, Section 10.15(F)(3) of
the Constitution of Louisiana, the Legislature of Louisiana, two-thirds of each house
concurring, does hereby authorize appropriation from the Revenue Stabilization Trust Fund
for the purpose of addressing emergency conditions across the state in Fiscal Year 2026-
2027.
Section 12.(A) The provisions of this Section and Sections 1, 2, 4, 5, 7, and 9
through 11 of this Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Section and
Sections 1, 2, 4, 5, 7, and 9 through 11 of this Act shall become effective on the day
following such approval.
(B) The provisions of Sections 3 and 8 of this Act shall become effective July 1,
2026.
Page 12 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 313 ENROLLED
(C) The provisions of Section 6 of this Act shall take effect and become operative
if and when the Act which originated as House Bill No. 145 of this 2026 Regular Session
of the Legislature is enacted and becomes effective.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 13 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.